Maryland, session 2025, SB0801.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
19–102.
This title applies only in Dorchester County.
19–1601.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0801*

SENATE BILL 801
(a) (1) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the Board may not
issue a new license for an establishment that is within 300 feet in a direct line of a place of
worship or a public or nonpublic kindergarten, elementary, or secondary school.
(2) The distance from the establishment to the place of worship or the
public or nonpublic kindergarten, elementary, or secondary school is to be measured from
the establishment in a direct line to the nearest point of the main building of the place of
worship or school.
(b) The prohibition against issuing a license in subsection (a) of this section does
not apply to the issuance of:
(1) a license for a premises that was licensed on October 1, 1996;
(2) a Class B (on–sale) beer, wine, and liquor license for a premises in
Cambridge, Secretary, or Hurlock; [or]
(3) a temporary license; OR
(4) A LICENSE IF THE BOARD RECEIVES WRITTEN CONSENT TO THE
ISSUANCE OF THE LICENSE FROM EACH PLACE OF WORSHIP OR SCHOOL LOCATED
WITHIN 300 FEET IN A DIRECT LINE OF THE ESTABLISHMENT FOR WHICH THE
LICENSE IS SOUGHT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.